Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1943
Member's liability to third parties.

A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of the corporation.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 43.